Hawaii, session 2026, HB2356.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1. The legislature finds that there are significant barriers to employment after an individual has been convicted of a crime and sentenced to serve time in prison.  The United States military is one of the largest employers in the State, and many military jobs require a security clearance.  Criminal convictions can create hurdles in the process of acquiring a security clearance, but convictions are not absolute disqualifiers. The only automatic disqualifiers are a lack of United States citizenship and ongoing use of an illegal drug, while waivers have been granted for candidates who have been convicted of crimes that resulted in a prison sentence of over one year.  When granting waivers, adjudicators look at factors such as the seriousness of the conduct, evidence of rehabilitation, and likelihood of recurrence. The purpose of this Act is to require the department of corrections and rehabilitation to provide certificates to qualified individuals as evidence of these mitigating factors to increase their eligibility for employment upon release. SECTION 2.  Section 353H-6, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "§353H-6  Employment of ex-offenders.  (a)  The director of labor and industrial relations shall take the necessary steps to ensure offenders and ex-offenders are included and involved in utilizing state and private resources for employment and training opportunities as well as life skills and educational opportunities. (b)  The department of corrections and rehabilitation, with the assistance of the department of taxation and the department of labor and industrial relations, shall develop and propose for legislative consideration, tax incentives for employers who hire individuals who were formerly incarcerated. (c) The department of corrections and rehabilitation shall issue a certificate of rehabilitation, which shall include evidence of the following: (1)  Fulfillment of sentence and all post-release obligations; provided that the Hawaii paroling authority shall retain primary responsibility for tracking and confirming post-release obligations; (2)  Completion of offender reentry programs; (3)  Summary of rehabilitation efforts; and (4)  Readiness for employment opportunities. (d)  The department of corrections and rehabilitation shall work closely and collaborate with state and federal agencies and private employers to educate stakeholders on the certification. (e)  The department of corrections and rehabilitation may work with state agencies to increase the availability and likelihood that eligible offenders will obtain a security clearance post-release if relevant to their employment pursuits with the State. (f)  The department of corrections and rehabilitation shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 91 relating to the issuance and interpretation of the certificate and its relevance to existing criminal history record checks." SECTION 3.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $ or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 to implement and administer the certification of rehabilitation. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the department of corrections and rehabilitation for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 4.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 5.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 3000.